Massachusetts, session 194th, SD4068.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, it shall be prohibited for any 
individual to borrow and subsequently refuse to return any item from an individual diagnosed 
with a neurodegenerative disease, including but not limited to, Alzheimer's disease, Parkinson's 
disease, or dementia. Any such act shall be considered larceny as defined under section 30 of 
chapter 266 of the General laws, and shall be punishable with all applicable civil and criminal 
fines and penalties.